Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,159
Board; staff support; development of revenue estimates; considerations.

The Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Department of Revenue shall provide such staff support as the Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board may require. The Legislative Fiscal Analyst, in developing revenue estimates pursuant to section 50-419, and the Department of Revenue, in developing revenue estimates for the Governor pursuant to section 81-125, shall consider the estimates of economic activity and the advisory forecast of General Fund receipts developed by the board pursuant to section 77-27,158.

Laws 1984, LB 892, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 343, § 2.